Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1992.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-ISURPLUS DONATION FARMER TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Scope of article.This article relates to a tax credit for farmers who donate surplus agricultural products to a qualified food bank.Section 1802-I. Definitions.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agricultural production." As defined in section 3 of the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the Agricultural Area Security Law."Agricultural products." Crops and livestock products."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible taxpayer." A farmer who engages in agricultural production within the borders of this Commonwealth and donates agricultural products to a qualified food bank."Farmer." A person who is engaged in the active use, management and operation of real and personal property for agricultural production."Qualified food bank." A charitable food organization enrolled in the Pennsylvania Agricultural Surplus System."Tax credit." A tax credit established under this article.Section 1803-I. Procedure.(a) Tax credit allowed.-- An eligible taxpayer may claim a tax credit against the tax due under Article III for the donation of agricultural products to a qualified food bank. The tax credit for a taxable year shall be the least of the following:(1) 100% of the sale price of the donated agricultural products.(2) The fair market value of the donated agricultural products.(3) $20,000.(b) Application and certification.-- 20250HB1992PN2514 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A tax credit may be claimed only after approval and certification by the department and shall be limited to the amount stated on the certificate issued under section 1804-I(a).(2) An eligible taxpayer must apply to the department for a tax credit in a form and manner specified by the department. The application shall include all of the following:(i) Reasonable proof of the total amount and type of agricultural products donated to the qualified food bank during the taxable year.(ii) Identification of the qualified food bank that received the donation.(iii) Verification and documentation necessary to meet other eligibility requirements as established by the department.(3) A donation of agricultural products must be acknowledged in writing by the qualified food bank and the acknowledgment shall be submitted with the application.(c) Duration and use of tax credit.-- A tax credit shall be limited to the liability for tax computed under Article III for the taxable year.(d) Limitations.-- A tax credit may not be sold, assigned, passed through, carried back or refunded. A tax credit may be carried forward for one taxable year and may be used only to the extent it cannot be used for the taxable year for which it is first approved. A tax credit may not be applied against tax withheld by an employer from an employee under Article III.Section 1804-I. Approval of tax credit.(a) Review.-- The department shall review applications for a 20250HB1992PN2514 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tax credit and, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, shall issue certificates for approved tax credits.(b) Tax clearance.-- Before approval, the Department of Revenue shall determine that the applicant has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years and has paid any balance of State tax due as determined at settlement or assessment or as otherwise determined by the Department of Revenue.Section 1805-I. Departmental duties.(a) Administration.-- The department shall administer this article, promulgate regulations and publish the forms necessary to implement this article. The department shall share information with the Department of Revenue to the extent necessary to administer this article and Article III and may consult and exchange information with the Department of Agriculture to verify eligibility and donations.(b) Limitation on amount.-- (1) The department may allocate no more than $5,000,000 in tax credits for the taxable year beginning after December 31, 2025.(2) The department shall allocate tax credits on a first-come, first-served basis beginning on January 1 of each year.Section 1806-I. Report.(a) Duty to report.-- No later than February 1, 2030, the department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall provide a report to the General Assembly on the tax credits issued for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.(b) Contents of report.-- The report shall include all of the 20250HB1992PN2514 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following:(1) Background information on eligible taxpayers and other information the department finds relevant to evaluating the effect of the tax credits on charitable donations of agricultural products.(2) The number and amount of tax credits issued.(3) The geographic distribution of tax credits issued.(4) The types of agricultural products most commonly donated by eligible taxpayers.(5) The number and amount of tax credits disallowed.(6) The number and amount of tax credit applications that exceeded the allocation available in each year.Section 1807-I. Expiration.The department may not approve applications for a tax credit under this article for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2035.Section 1808-I. Applicability.This article shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1992PN2514 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920